Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.171

Engaging in business without license—Penalty.

Any person required by this chapter to obtain a license who engages in business as an escrow agent without applying for and receiving the license required by this chapter, or willfully continues to act as an escrow agent or licensed escrow officer after surrender, expiration, suspension, or revocation of his or her license, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars per day for each day's violation, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1999 c 30 s 17; 1965 c 153 s 14. Formerly RCW 18.44.140.]

NOTES:

Date for initial compliance: "All persons doing business within this state as an escrow agent as defined in this act, who may be required by this act to register with the department, shall comply with the provisions hereof not later than December 31, 1965." [ 1965 c 153 s 15.]